Connecticut, session 2026, SB00326.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of
Social Services shall increase and then eliminate the asset limit for the
HUSKY C health program, as defined in section 17b-290 of the general
statutes, over a five-year period in accordance with the provisions of this
section:
(1) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, the commissioner shall
increase the asset limit for (A) an unmarried person from one thousand
six hundred dollars to ten thousand dollars, and (B) married persons
from two thousand four hundred dollars to fifteen thousand dollars;
(2) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, the commissioner shall
increase the asset limit for (A) an unmarried person to twenty-five
thousand dollars, and (B) married persons to forty thousand dollars;
(3) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2030, the commissioner shall
increase the asset limit for (A) an unmarried person to seventy-five
thousand dollars, and (B) married persons to one hundred thousand
dollars;
(4) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2031, the commissioner shall
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 326
increase the asset limit for (A) an unmarried person to one hundred
thousand dollars, and (B) married persons to one hundred fifty
thousand dollars; and
(5) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2032, and each fiscal year
thereafter, there shall be no asset limit for unmarried or married
persons.
(b) The Commissioner of Social Services shall allow any person,
whose income exceeds the income limits for the HUSKY C health
program but who otherwise qualifies, to qualify for the program by
spending down such person's excess income over the program income
limits on incurred medical bills in accordance with 42 CFR 435.831.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter until July 1,
2032, the commissioner shall file a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, with the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies and
human services on (1) the number of persons eligible for the HUSKY C
health program for the prior fiscal year, (2) the number of persons found
ineligible for the program for exceeding the asset limit and the amount
by which their assets exceeded the limit, (3) projections from available
data as to how many persons would qualify for HUSKY C in the
succeeding fiscal year based on the asset limits for that fiscal year, and
(4) any increased costs incurred by the state or projected to be incurred
by the state in the succeeding fiscal year due to changes in the asset
limits.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
HS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2